Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB578.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "duplex" means a residential structure divided into two
(2) separate dwelling units each with its own entrance.
(2) Duplexes shall be considered a permitted use in all residential zones and shall not
be subject to permitting or review under to this chapter beyond that required for
single-family homes.
(3) A planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any regulation or ordinance that:
(a) Prohibits duplexes in residential zones;
(b) Imposes requirements on duplexes that are more restrictive than those
placed on single-family homes; or
(c) Assesses any fees in addition to those required for single-family homes.
(4) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a planning unit from adopting or
enforcing ordinances or regulations generally applicable to all dwelling units.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:19 PM Jacketed